Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 6. Financial and Management Regulation.

Sec. 42.05.511.
Unreasonable management practices.

The commission may investigate the management of a public utility, including staffing patterns, wage and salary scales and agreements, investment policies and practices, and purchasing and payment arrangements with affiliated interests, for the purpose of determining inefficient or unreasonable practices that adversely affect the cost or quality of service of the public utility.

Where unreasonable practices are found to exist, the commission may, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, take appropriate action to protect the public from the inefficient or unreasonable practices and may order the public utility to take the corrective action the commission may require to achieve effective development and regulation of public utility services.

In a rate proceeding, the utility involved has the burden of proving that any written or unwritten contract or arrangement it may have with any of its affiliated interests for the furnishing of any services or for the purchase, sale, lease, or exchange of any property is necessary and consistent with the public interest and that the payment made therefor, or consideration given, is reasonably based, in part, on the submission of satisfactory proof as to the cost to the affiliated interest of furnishing the service or property and, in part, on the estimated cost the utility would have incurred if it furnished the service or property with its own personnel and capital.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am §§
85, 86 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For limitation on commission’s authority with respect to certain contracts between utilities and the Alaska Power Authority, see AS

42.05.431(c)

-(e).

Administrative Code. —

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), deleted “but not limited to” following “including”, and inserted “and” following “investment policies and practices,”; made stylistic changes in (c).

Sec. 42.05.520.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.521.
Impaired capital.

When the commission finds that the capital of a public utility corporation is impaired, or might become impaired, it may, after investigation and hearing, issue an order directing the public utility to cease paying dividends on its common stock until the impairment has been removed.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Sec. 42.05.530.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.531.
Distribution of surplus and profits.

The surplus and profits of a public utility shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws or ordinances controlling the utility.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 90 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 42.05.540.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]